District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.159

Close corporations — Limitations on continuation of close corporation status.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, ch. 269, § 159
as added Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(fff), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.159.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.58.